Washington statutes.
RCW 25.15.033

Law of this state governs.

The law of this state governs:

(1) The internal affairs of a limited liability company; and

(2) The liability of a member as member and a manager as manager for the debts, obligations, or other liabilities of a limited liability company.

[ 2015 c 188 s 9.]